Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-215.01
Village; dissolution; county, defined.

For purposes of sections 17-215 to 17-219.03, when reference is made to the county within which the village is located and the village is located in more than one county, county means the county within which the greater portion of the area of the village is located.

Laws 1998, LB 1346, § 1.